Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2858
Holder of temporary educational permit; rules and regulations; applicability.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the holder of any temporary educational permit shall be subject to all of the rules and regulations prescribed for pharmacists regularly licensed in the State of Nebraska and such other rules and regulations as may be adopted by the department, with the recommendation of the board, with respect to such permits in order to carry out the purposes of the Pharmacy Practice Act.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 460;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 121;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.25;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 954.